Maryland, session 2026, HB0413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–2501.
In this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland–Ireland Trade Commission.
5–2502.
(a) There is a Maryland–Ireland Trade Commission in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Commission is to study and promote trade between
Maryland and Ireland.
5–2503.
– 1 –

Ch. 37 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of State, or the Secretary of State’s designee;
(3) [two members] ONE MEMBER of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by
the President of the Senate, who [have] HAS knowledge of organizations that promote Irish
affairs, or current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs, or [have]
HAS an interest in the well–being of trade relations between Maryland and Ireland;
(4) [two members] ONE MEMBER of the House of Delegates, appointed by
the Speaker of the House, who [have] HAS knowledge of organizations that promote Irish
affairs, or current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs, or [have]
HAS an interest in the well–being of trade relations between Maryland and Ireland; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and
consent of the Senate:
(i) one representative of a public institution of higher education;
(ii) one representative of the Maryland Chamber of Commerce or its
successor organization; [and]
(iii) two representatives of the Irish–American community, who may
not be of the same political party; AND
(IV) TWO MEMBERS OF THE PRIVATE SECTOR.
(b) The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be elected from among the
members of the Commission.
(c) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(d) The Governor may remove an appointed member for incompetence,
misconduct, or failure to perform the duties of the position.
5–2504.
(a) The Commission shall study and make recommendations regarding:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 37
(1) advancing bilateral trade and investment between Maryland and
Ireland;
(2) initiating joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to Maryland
and Ireland;
(3) promoting business and academic exchanges between Maryland and
Ireland;
(4) encouraging mutual economic support between Maryland and Ireland;
(5) encouraging mutual investment in the infrastructure of Maryland and
Ireland; and
(6) other issues as determined by the Commission.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, the
Commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
Chapter 409 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [2] 4 years and, at the end of
September 30, [2026] 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –